Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 4. General Provisions.

Sec. 43.55.890.
Disclosure of tax information.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of AS

40.25.100

, and regardless of whether the information is considered under AS

43.05.230(e)

to constitute statistics classified to prevent the identification of particular returns or reports, the department may publish the following information under this chapter, if aggregated among three or more producers or explorers, showing by month or calendar year and by lease or property, unit, or area of the state:

the amount of oil or gas production;

the amount of taxes levied under this chapter or paid under this chapter;

the effective tax rates under this chapter;

the gross value of oil or gas at the point of production;

the transportation costs for oil or gas;

qualified capital expenditures, as defined in AS

43.55.023

;

exploration expenditures under AS

43.55.025

;

production tax values of oil or gas under AS

43.55.160

;

lease expenditures under AS

43.55.165

;

adjustments to lease expenditures under AS

43.55.170

;

tax credits applicable or potentially applicable against taxes levied by this chapter.

History.

(§ 64 ch 1 SSSLA 2007)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 1, SSSLA 2007 (HB 2001), presenting, among other matter, proposals to allow the Department of Revenue to publish specific oil and gas production tax information in aggregate form, see 2007 House Journal 1547 — 1550.

Sec. 43.55.895.
Applicability to municipal entities.

Notwithstanding AS

29.35.670(a)

or other provision of law, a producer that is a municipal entity is subject to taxation and payment of surcharges under this chapter for oil and gas that it sells to another party.

A municipal entity subject to taxation because of this section

is eligible for tax credits proportionate to its production taxable under AS

43.55.011(e)

; and

shall allocate its lease expenditures in proportion to its production taxable under AS

43.55.011(e)

.

In this section, “municipal entity” means a municipality, municipally owned utility, public corporation of a municipality, or entity established by more than one municipality.

History.

(§ 64 ch 1 SSSLA 2007; am § 30 ch 4 4SSLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (b), designated a portion of the subsection as (1), and in (b)(1), deleted “all” following “is eligible for”, inserted “proportionate to its production taxable under AS

43.55.011(e)

” following “tax credits”, added (b)(2), deleting “under this chapter to the same extent as any other producer” at the end.

Sec. 43.55.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“barrel of oil” means 42 United States gallons of oil of 231 cubic inches a gallon computed at a temperature of 60 degrees Fahrenheit;

“British thermal unit” means the quantity of heat required to raise the temperature of one pound of water from 58.5 degrees Fahrenheit to 59.5 degrees Fahrenheit at a constant pressure of one atmosphere;

“BTU equivalent barrel” means

in the case of oil, one barrel;

in the case of gas, the amount of gas that has a heating value of 6,000,000 British thermal units;

“catastrophic oil discharge” has the meaning given in AS

46.04.900

;

“Cook Inlet sedimentary basin” has the meaning given in regulations adopted to implement AS

38.05.180(f)(4)

;

“cubic foot of gas” means the volume of gas contained in one cubic foot of space measured at a pressure base of 14.65 pounds per square inch absolute and a temperature base of 60 degrees Fahrenheit;

“explorer” means a person who, in exploring for new oil or gas reserves, incurs expenditures;

“gas” means

all natural, associated, or casinghead gas;

all hydrocarbons that

are recovered by mechanical separation of well fluids or by gas processing in a gas processing plant; and

exist in a gaseous phase at the completion of mechanical separation and any gas processing in a gas processing plant; and

all other hydrocarbons produced from a well not defined as oil;

“gas processing”

means processing a gaseous mixture of hydrocarbons

by means of absorption, adsorption, externally applied refrigeration, artificial compression followed by adiabatic expansion using the Joule-Thomson effect, or another physical process that is not mechanical separation; and

for the purpose of extracting and recovering liquid hydrocarbons;

does not include gas treatment;

“gas processing plant” means a facility that

extracts and recovers liquid hydrocarbons from a gaseous mixture of hydrocarbons by gas processing; and

is located upstream of the inlet of any pipeline transporting gas to a gas treatment plant and upstream of the inlet of any gas pipeline system transporting gas to a market;

“gas treatment”

means conditioning gas and removing from gas nonhydrocarbon substances for the purpose of rendering the gas acceptable for tender and acceptance into a gas pipeline system;

includes incidentally removing liquid hydrocarbons from the gas;

does not include

dehydration required to facilitate the movement of gas from the well to the point where gas processing takes place;

the scrubbing of liquids from gas to facilitate gas processing;

“gas treatment plant” means a facility that performs gas treatment, regardless of whether the facility also performs gas processing;

“gross value at the point of production” means

for oil, the value of the oil at its point of production without deduction of any costs upstream of that point of production;

for gas, the value of the gas at its point of production without deduction of any costs upstream of that point of production;

“heating value” means the gross number of BTUs released by complete combustion of an amount of gas;

“landowner’s royalty interest” means

a lessor’s royalty interest under an oil and gas lease; or

a royalty interest that is

held by a surface owner of land from which oil or gas is produced; and

granted in exchange for the right to use the surface of that land or as compensation for damage to the surface of that land;

“lease or property” means any right, title, or interest in or the right to produce or recover oil or gas including:

a mineral interest;

a leasehold interest;

a working interest, royalty interest, overriding royalty interest, production payment, net profit interest, or any other interest in a lease, concession, joint venture, or other agreement for exploration, development, or production of oil and gas or of gas only;

a working interest, royalty interest, overriding royalty interest, production payment, net profit interest or any other interest in an agreement for unitization or pooling under the provisions of 26 U.S.C. 614(b)(3) (Internal Revenue Code) as defined on January 1, 1974;

“oil” means

crude petroleum oil; and

all liquid hydrocarbons that are recovered by mechanical separation of well fluids or by gas processing in a gas processing plant;

“oil and gas lease” includes an oil and gas lease, a gas only lease, and an oil only lease;

“ownership or right to which is exempt from taxation” means any ownership interest of the federal government or the state;

“pipeline quality” means good and merchantable condition;

“point of production” means

for oil, the automatic custody transfer meter or device through which the oil enters into the facilities of a carrier pipeline or other transportation carrier in a condition of pipeline quality; in the absence of an automatic custody transfer meter or device, “point of production” means the mechanism or device to measure the quantity of oil that has been approved by the department for that purpose, through which the oil is tendered and accepted in a condition of pipeline quality into the facilities of a carrier pipeline or other transportation carrier or into a field topping plant;

for gas that is

not subjected to or recovered by mechanical separation or run through a gas processing plant, the farthest upstream of the following locations: the first point where the gas is accurately metered, the inlet of any pipeline transporting the gas to a gas treatment plant, or the inlet of any gas pipeline system transporting the gas to a market;

subjected to or recovered by mechanical separation but not run through a gas processing plant, the farthest upstream of the following locations: the first point where the gas is accurately metered after completion of mechanical separation, the inlet of any pipeline transporting the gas after completion of mechanical separation to a gas treatment plant, or the inlet of any gas pipeline system transporting the gas after completion of mechanical separation to a market;

run through a gas processing plant, the farthest upstream of the following locations: the first point where the gas is accurately metered downstream of the gas processing plant, the inlet of any pipeline downstream of the gas processing plant transporting the gas to a gas treatment plant, or the inlet of any gas pipeline system downstream of the gas processing plant transporting the gas to a market;

“producer” means an owner of an operating right, operating interest, or working interest in a mineral interest in oil or gas;

“regular production” has the meaning given in AS

31.05.170

;

“surcharge” means

when used in AS

43.55.201

—

43.55.299

, the surcharge levied by AS

43.55.201

;

when used in AS

43.55.300

—

43.55.310

, the surcharge levied by AS

43.55.300

;

“unit” means a group of tracts of land that is

subject to a cooperative or a unit plan of development or operation that has been certified by the commissioner of natural resources under AS

38.05.180(p)

;

subject to a cooperative or a unit plan of development or operation that has been certified by the United States Secretary of the Interior under 30 U.S.C. 226(m);

subject to an agreement of the owners of interests in the tracts of land to validly integrate their interests to provide for the unitized management, development, and operation of the tracts of land as a unit, within the meaning of AS

31.05.110(a)

; or

within the unit area of a unit created by order of the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission under AS

31.05.110(b)

;

“used in the state” means delivered for consumption as fuel in the state, including as fuel consumed to generate electricity.

History.

(§ 1 ch 7 ESLA 1955; am § 17 ch 101 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 4 FSSLA 1973; am § 4 ch 159 SLA 1975; am §§ 7, 9 ch 136 SLA 1977; am § 2 ch 112 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 114 SLA 1989; am § 38 ch 168 SLA 1990; am § 18 ch 128 SLA 1994; am § 50 ch 49 SLA 2004; am §§ 30 — 34 ch 2 TSSLA 2006; am § 65 ch 1 SSSLA 2007; am §§ 63 — 65 ch 14 SLA 2014; am § 31 ch 4 4SSLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

43.55.140

; renumbered in 1989.
Paragraphs within the section were renumbered in 1983, 1989, 2006, 2008, and 2016 to maintain the alphabetical order of the terms.

Administrative Code. —

For gross value at the point of production of oil and gas, see 15 AAC 55, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added (26) [now (23)].